Utah statutes.
63M-7-524.   Attorney fees.
(1)  The claims procedures shall be sufficiently simple that the assistance of
an attorney is unnecessary, and no attorney fees shall be paid for the
assistance of an attorney or any other representative in filing the claim or
providing information to the reparations officer.
(2)  Attorney fees may be granted in the following circumstances and shall be
paid out of the reparations award not to exceed 15% of the amount of the
reparations award:
(a)  when an award has been denied and, after a hearing, the decision to deny
is overturned; or
(b)  when minor dependents of a deceased victim require assistance in
establishing a trust or determining a guardian.
(3)  An attorney or any other person providing assistance in a reparations
claim, who contracts for or receives sums not allowed under this chapter, is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.  This provision shall not extend to attorneys
who assist the victim in filing a civil action against the perpetrator.
